Wyoming statutes. Title 26 Insurance Code
Chapter 19 Group and Blanket Disability Insurance

Cross references. —

For provisions as to disability insurance generally, see §§

26-18-101

through

26-18-136

.

As to credit life and disability insurance, see §§

26-21-101

through

26-21-114

.

For provisions authorizing group insurance for state employees, see §

9-3-201

.

As to state employees and officials group health insurance, see §§

9-3-202

through

9-3-213

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

44 Am. Jur. 2d Insurance 1463 to 1475; 44a Am. Jur. 2d Insurance §§ 1828 to 1863.

Termination of employee's individual coverage under group policy for nonpayment of premiums, 22 ALR4th 321.

Construction of incontestable clause applicable to disability insurance, 67 ALR5th 513.